Illinois, session 104th, SB1341.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 5and Persons with Disabilities Act is amended by changing 6Section 8c as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 575/8c)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.608c)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on June 30, 2030)9    Sec. 8c. Recommended rules and and regulations for the 10establishment and continuation of narrowly tailored sheltered 11markets under Section 8b shall be approved by the Council 12prior to submission by the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 13to the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules. These rules 14shall include but not be limited to agency goals, waivers and 15procedures for use of sheltered markets.16(Source: P.A. 103-961, eff. 8-9-24.)